Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1307
Child placed
in foster care; court; duties;
office; provide information to local board.

(1) Each court which has placed
a child in foster care shall send to the office (a) a copy of the plan or permanency
plan, prepared by the person or court in charge of the child in accordance
with section 43-1312, to effectuate rehabilitation of the foster child and
family unit or permanent placement of the child and (b) a
copy of the progress reports as they relate to the plan or permanency plan,
including, but not limited to, the court order and the report and recommendations
of the guardian ad litem.

(2) The office
may provide the designated local board with copies of the information provided
by the court under subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 37;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 8.